Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1407.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "redevelopment assistance capital project" in section 302 of the act of February 9, 1999 (P.L.1, No.1), known as the Capital Facilities Debt Enabling Act, is amended to read:Section 302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Redevelopment assistance capital project." As follows:(1) The design and construction of a project which meets all of the following:1234567891011121314151617181920 [(1)] (i) Is a project, including infrastructure associated with the project. A project does not include highways, bridges, waste disposal facilities, sewage facilities or water facilities. This paragraph includes:[(i)] (A) Storm water, water or sewer infrastructure, or tunnels, bridges or roads, when associated with a project that is part of an economic development project.[(ii)] (B) Hospital facilities and capital improvements for hospital facilities.[(2)] (ii) Is a project which will generate substantial increases in or maintain current levels of employment, tax revenues or other measures of economic activity. This paragraph includes:[(i)] (A) a community asset project; and[(ii)] (B) a housing project that will support and generate economic activity.[(3)] (iii) Is a project that has a regional or multijurisdictional impact or, in the case of housing, is part of a community revitalization plan.[(4)] (iv) Is eligible for tax-exempt bond funding under existing Federal law and regulations.[(5)] (v) Has at least a 50% non-State financial participation documented at the time of application, including a portion of any funds reserved for future physical maintenance and operation of the project:[(i)] (A) at least half of which is secured funding;[(ii)] (B) toward which the only noncash non-State financial participation permitted is land or fixed assets 20260SB1407PN1858 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 which have a substantial useful life and are directly related to the project;[(iii)] (C) toward which State funds from other programs may not be used; and[(iv)] (D) toward which funds from Federal sources may be used.[(6)] (vi) Has a total project cost of at least $1,000,000.[(7)] (vii) (Reserved).(2) The term includes a fire truck or firefighting equipment to the extent that the request for assistance does not exceed $150,000 and the total purchase cost of the fire truck or firefighting equipment is at least $300,000.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1407PN1858 - 3 - 123456789101112131415